California, session 20252026, SB971.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 105146) is added to Part 4 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 4. Healthy Aging Community Partnerships Partnership Program.105146.  (a) A local health department, area agency on aging, local school district, community college, public or private college, public or private university, or other appropriate county department, as determined by the county, may establish a Healthy Aging Community Partnership Program to provide community-based programs for older adults individuals designed to promote healthy aging, social engagement, and independent living in collaboration with relevant local entities, including school districts, libraries, faith institutions, and community organizations.(b) If a local entity establishes a community-based program pursuant to subdivision (a), the program activities may include, but are not limited to, technology assistance, physical activity, music or arts programming, cultural programming, language learning opportunities, shared meals, and other community-based enrichment activities that support healthy aging and social connection.(c) For purposes of this section, “older adults” means persons 55 years of age or older. individual” has the same meaning as defined in Section 9018 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(d) This section shall not be construed to be mandatory for any local entity or department to implement.(e) Implementation of this section shall be subject to the availability of local resources and partnerships.